test/src/morphology/N-susha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sušā: # Noun 50 'eng /est õeke/fin' - full paradigm
     sušā+N+Sg+Nom: sušā
     sušā+N+Sg+Gen: sušā
     sušā+N+Sg+Par: suššõ
     sušā+N+Sg+Dat: sušān
     sušā+N+Sg+Ins: sušāks
     sušā+N+Sg+Ill: suššõ
     sušā+N+Sg+Ela: sušāst
     sušā+N+Pl+Nom: sušād
     sušā+N+Pl+Gen: sušād
     sušā+N+Pl+Par: sušīdi
     sušā+N+Pl+Dat: sušādõn
     sušā+N+Pl+Ins: sušādõks
     sušā+N+Pl+Ill: sušīz
     sušā+N+Pl+Ela: sušīst
